Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Interstate Compact for Arrest of Fugitives and Attendance ofWitnesses

§ 7-3-301.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 89, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 32, § 1, Part I, pertained to the right to enter other states to arrest persons who have committed felonies or escaped custody.

§ 7-3-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 89, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to reciprocity between states for attendance of witnesses for other reasons, see §§

7-11-404

through

7-11-406

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 32, § 1, Part II, related to the attendance of witnesses.

Laws 2007, ch. 89, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.

Cited

in

Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 7-3-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 89, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 32, § 1, Part IV, related to the force and effect; appointment of administrators.

Laws 2007, ch. 89, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.